Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-311
Estimates of cost.

The engineer shall also make an estimate of the cost of the entire drainage works and improvements required in the district to protect and reclaim the lands and property, showing the several items of the same.

Laws 1905, c. 161, § 9, p. 614;

Laws 1909, c. 147, § 3, p. 509;

R.S.1913, § 1806;

C.S.1922, § 1753;

C.S.1929, § 31-410;

R.S.1943, § 31-311.

District engineer is required to make estimate of cost of entire project. Petersen v. Thurston, 161 Neb. 758, 74 N.W.2d 528 (1956).